Missouri, session 2026, SB1400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 484.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 484.020,
to read as follows:
484.020. 1. No person shall engage in the practice of
law or do law business, as defined in section 484.010, or
both, unless he shall have been duly licensed therefor and
while his license therefor is in full force and effect, nor
shall any association, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation, except a professional corporation
organized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 356, a
limited liability company organized and registered pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 347, or a limited liability
partnership organized or registered pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 358, engage in the practice of the law
or do law business as defined in section 484.010, or both.
2. Any person, association, partnership, limited
liability company, or corporation who shall violate the
foregoing prohibition of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction therefor shall be punished
by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars and costs of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1400 2
prosecution and shall be subject to be sued for treble the
amount which shall have been paid him or it for any service
rendered in violation [hereof] of this section or treble the
amount of actual damages resulting from the service rendered
in violation of this section by the person, firm,
association, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation paying [the same] for the service within two
years from the date the same shall have been paid and if
within said time such person, firm, association,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation shall
neglect and fail to sue for or recover such treble amount,
then the state of Missouri shall have the right to and shall
sue for such treble amount and recover the same and upon the
recovery thereof such treble amount shall be paid into the
treasury of the state of Missouri.
3. It is hereby made the duty of the attorney general
of the state of Missouri or the prosecuting attorney of any
county or city in which service of process may be had upon
the person, firm, association, partnership, limited
liability company, or corporation liable hereunder, to
institute all suits necessary for the recovery by the state
of Missouri of such amounts in the name and on behalf of the
state.
✓